Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6604
Fraudulent
insurance acts; enumerated.

For purposes of the Insurance
Fraud Act, a person or entity commits a fraudulent insurance act if he or
she:

(1) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive presents, causes
to be presented, or prepares with knowledge or belief that it will be presented
to or by an insurer, or any agent of an insurer, any statement as part of,
in support of, or in denial of a claim for payment or other benefit from an
insurer or pursuant to an insurance policy knowing that the statement contains
any false, incomplete, or misleading information concerning any fact or thing
material to a claim;

(2) Assists, abets, solicits, or conspires with another to prepare or
make any statement that is intended to be presented to or by an insurer or
person in connection with or in support of any claim for payment or other
benefit from an insurer or pursuant to an insurance policy knowing that the
statement contains any false, incomplete, or misleading information concerning
any fact or thing material to the claim;

(3) Makes any false or fraudulent representations as to the death or
disability of a policy or certificate holder or a covered person in any statement
or certificate for the purpose of fraudulently obtaining money or benefit
from an insurer;

(4) Knowingly and willfully transacts any contract, agreement, or instrument
which violates this section;

(5) Receives money for the purpose of purchasing insurance and converts
the money to the person's own benefit;

(6) Willfully embezzles, abstracts, purloins, misappropriates, or converts
money, funds, premiums, credits, or other property of an insurer or person
engaged in the business of insurance;

(7) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive issues or possesses
fake or counterfeit insurance policies, certificates of insurance, insurance
identification cards, or insurance binders;

(8) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive makes any false
entry of a material fact in or pertaining to any document or statement filed
with or required by the department;

(9) Knowingly and with intent to defraud or deceive removes, conceals,
alters, diverts, or destroys assets or records of an insurer or person engaged
in the business of insurance or attempts to remove, conceal, alter, divert,
or destroy assets or records of an insurer or person engaged in the business
of insurance;

(10) Knowingly and with
the intent to defraud or deceive provides false, incomplete, or misleading
information to an insurer concerning the number, location, or classification
of employees for the purpose of lessening or reducing the premium otherwise
chargeable for workers' compensation insurance coverage;

(11) Willfully operates as
or aids and abets another operating as a discount medical plan organization
in violation of subsection (1) of section 44-8306; or

(12) Willfully collects fees
for purported membership in a discount medical plan but purposefully fails
to provide the promised benefits.

Laws 1995, LB 385, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 272, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 547, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 32;

Laws 2009, LB208, § 2.